Hawaii statutes.
§383-8 Included and excluded service.
If the services performed during one-half or more of any pay period by an
individual for the person employing the individual constitute employment, all
the services of the individual for the period shall be deemed to be employment;
but if the services performed during more than one-half of any pay period by an
individual for the person employing the individual do not constitute
employment, then none of the services of the individual for the period shall be
deemed to be employment. As used in this section, the term "pay
period" means a period (of not more than thirty-one consecutive days) for
which a payment of remuneration is ordinarily made to the individual by the
person employing the individual. This section shall not be applicable with
respect to services performed in a pay period by an individual for the person
employing the individual, where any of the service is excepted by section 383-7(a)(8).
[L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 8; RL 1945, §4209; RL 1955, §93-8; HRS §383-8;
gen ch 1985; am L 2015, c 35, §13]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next